Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-525
Child welfare services; state assistance funds; expenditure.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall expend state assistance funds allocated for child welfare services in establishing, extending, and strengthening, especially in rural areas, child welfare services mentioned in sections 43-501 to 43-526, for which other funds are not specifically or sufficiently made available by such sections or other laws of this state.

Laws 1935, Spec. Sess., c. 30, § 25, p. 189;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 43-525;

R.S.1943, § 43-525;

Laws 1982, LB 522, § 17;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 172;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 121.